Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1105
Director of Administrative Services; compensation.

The compensation of the Director of Administrative Services shall be fixed by the Governor, subject to availability of appropriations.

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 5, p. 1694.